Massachusetts, session 194th, H2801.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 6 and 7 the words "until the
remarriage of said surviving spouse".
SECTION 2. Section 9B of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out in lines 4 and 5, the words ",until the remarriage or death of said
surviving spouse".
SECTION 3. Section 9B of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out in lines 9, 10 and 11, the words “the entire cost of such premium
without any contribution by the governmental unit” and inserting in place thereof the following
words: - one-half the cost of such premiums with one-half the cost of such premiums paid by the
governmental unit.
SECTION 4. Section 9D of said chapter 32B is hereby repealed.
of 2

SECTION 5. The provisions in sections 1 and 2 of this act shall apply prospectively to
surviving spouses of a deceased employee or retired employee, who remarried prior to the
effective date of this act and whose insurance coverage, upon remarriage, was terminated under
chapters 32A or 32B of the General Laws.
SECTION 6. The provisions in sections 1, 2 and 3 of this act shall be prospective from
the effective date of this act and shall not entitle any surviving spouse of a deceased employee or
retired employee to any retroactive insurance coverage.
of 2